Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 3
Scope, Jurisdiction and Courts

§ 15-1-301. Territorial application.

Except as otherwise provided in this code, this code applies to (1) the affairs and estates of decedents, missing persons, and persons to be protected, domiciled in this state, (2) the property of nonresidents located in this state or property coming into the control of a fiduciary who is subject to the laws of this state, (3) incapacitated persons and minors in this state, (4) survivorship and related accounts in this state, and (5) trusts subject to administration in this state.

§ 15-1-302. [Reserved.]

Where a proceeding under this code could be maintained in more than one (1) place in this state, the court in which the proceeding is first commenced has the exclusive right to proceed.

If proceedings concerning the same estate, protected person, ward or trust are commenced in more than one (1) court of this state, the court in which the proceeding[s] was [were] first commenced shall continue to hear the matter, and the other courts shall hold the matter in abeyance until the question of venue is decided, and if the ruling court determines that venue is properly in another court, it shall transfer the proceeding to the other court.

If a court finds that in the interest of justice, a proceeding or file should be located in another court of this state, the court making the finding may transfer the proceeding or file to the other court.

§ 15-1-304. [Reserved.]

The clerk of court shall keep a single file for each decedent, ward, protected person or trust involved in any document which may be filed with the court under this code, including petitions and applications, demands for notices or bonds, trust registrations, and of any orders or responses relating thereto by the registrar or court, and establish and maintain a system for indexing, filing or recording which is sufficient to enable users of the records to obtain adequate information. Upon payment of the fees required by law the clerk must issue certified copies of any probated wills, letters issued to personal representatives, or any other record or paper filed or recorded. Certificates relating to probated wills must indicate whether the decedent was domiciled in this state and whether the probate was formal or informal. Certificates relating to letters must show the date of appointment.

§ 15-1-305A. Recording permitted — Effect. — Letters of personal representatives (foreign or domestic), a statement of informal probate, probated will, determination of heirship, order made in a testacy proceeding, or will otherwise admissible in evidence as provided in section 15-3-102[, Idaho Code,] of this code; any deed, assignment, release or other instrument executed by an appointed personal representative of the decedent; an affidavit of a successor in interest to property of a decedent; and a decree in any testacy proceeding in another state, any of which affect title to real property, may be recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the real property affected by any such letters, statement, determination, order, document or decree is located. From the time of filing the same for record, notice is imparted to all persons of the contents thereof.

§ 15-1-306. Jury trial.

If duly demanded, a party is entitled to trial by jury in any proceeding in which any controverted question of fact arises as to which any party has a constitutional right to trial by jury.

§ 15-1-307. Registrar — Powers.

The acts and orders which this code specifies as performable by the registrar will be performed by a magistrate or district judge.

§ 15-1-308, 15-1-309. [Reserved.]

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this code or by rule, every document filed with the court under this code including applications, petitions, and demands for notice, shall be deemed to include an oath, affirmation, or statement to the effect that its representations are true as far as the person executing or filing it knows or is informed, and penalties for perjury may follow deliberate falsification therein.

§ 15-1-311. Exercise of powers.

Powers under this act may be exercised by the court at any time, in chambers or in open court, as may be appropriate. Powers conferred upon the registrar of wills by this act may be exercised at any time.

§ 15-1-312. Execution of deed.

Should any persons be entitled to a deed from a personal representative and such personal representative be discharged or disqualified or refuse to execute the same, such deed may be executed by the court authorizing such sale or distribution or the clerk of such court and shall entitle the buyer or distributee to his property.

§ 15-1-303. Venue — Multiple proceedings — Transfer.

§ 15-1-305. Records and certified copies.

§ 15-1-310. Oath or affirmation on filed documents.